Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 5

Dentists

63-5-101. Board of dentistry.

The practice of dentistry and of dental hygiene shall be under the direct supervision of a board to be known as the board of dentistry, referred to in this chapter as the “board.”

The administrative duties pursuant to licensure and the collection of fees for licensure shall be vested in the division of health related boards of the department of health, referred to in this chapter as the “division.”

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 2; 1969, ch. 29, § 1; 1978, ch. 824, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-530; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. The board of dentistry, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Division of health related boards, title 63, ch. 1.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Licensing, §§ 68-1-103 — 68-1-107.

Occupation tax on dentists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

Sales and use tax exemption, § 67-6-335.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 14; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus § 11; 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-5-102. Composition of board.

The board shall consist of seven (7) practicing dentists, two (2) practicing dental hygienists and one (1) practicing registered dental assistant, whose duty it is to carry out this chapter. Of the seven (7) dentists, two (2) shall be appointed from each grand division of the state, and the appointment of the other dentists shall alternate among the grand divisions on an equal basis, but without regard to consecutive terms of a board member.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 3; 1978, ch. 824, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-531; Acts 1984, ch. 528, § 3; 1990, ch. 1031, § 1; 1997, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 927, § 3; 2001, ch. 330, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

63-5-103. Appointment of members — Term of office — Removal.

The dentist members of the board may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested dentist groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dental Association. No person is eligible for appointment as a dentist member of the board unless such person has been an actual and bona fide resident and a legally licensed practicing dentist of this state for a period of five (5) years or more immediately preceding such appointment.

The dental hygienist members may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested dental hygienist groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dental Hygienists Association. No person is eligible for appointment as a dental hygienist member of the board unless that person has been an actual and bona fide resident and a legally licensed practicing dental hygienist of this state for a period of five (5) years or more immediately preceding such appointment.

The dental assistant member may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested dental assistant groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dental Assistants' Association. No person is eligible for appointment as a dental assistant member of the board unless that person has been an actual and bona fide resident and has been a legally registered and practicing dental assistant of this state for a period of five (5) years or more immediately preceding such appointment.

The governor shall consult with interested dental groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dental Association, the Tennessee Dental Hygienists Association and the Tennessee Dental Assistants' Association to determine qualified persons to fill the positions as provided in subsection (a).

The terms of members of the board are three (3) years, with the terms staggered so that the terms of no more than three (3) members expire each year. No member is eligible to serve on the board for more than three (3) consecutive full terms, but any person thus ineligible shall thereafter be eligible for nomination and appointment to the board, as provided in this section, after three (3) years have elapsed since that person's previous service on the board.

The governor shall make appointments to the board not later than one (1) month after the expiration of the term of office of any member and such or further delay in the appointment shall be deducted from the term of the appointment. All vacancies occurring in the board by such reasons as death or resignation shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term from lists submitted to the governor as provided in this section. If such vacancy is not filled within thirty (30) days by the governor, the board itself shall fill such vacancy for the unexpired term. No person is eligible to appointment to the board who is regularly employed by or is a member of the governing body of any dental school, college or dental department of any university or any school of dental hygiene or dental assisting or with any dental supply business or dental laboratory.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Members of the board shall continue in office until the expiration of the terms for which they were respectively appointed and until such time as their successors have been duly appointed.

A member of the board may be removed upon one (1) or more of the following grounds:

The refusal or inability for any reason of a board member to perform that member's duties as a member of the board in an efficient, responsible and professional manner;

The misuse of office by a member of the board to obtain personal, pecuniary or material gain or advantage for that member or another through such office; or

The violation of this chapter or of any of the rules and regulations of the board hereafter properly promulgated.

The proceedings for such removal shall be in accordance with title 8, chapter 47.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 4; 1978, ch. 824, § 3; 1981, ch. 99, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-532; Acts 1984, ch. 528, § 4; 1985, ch. 71, § 1; 1986, ch. 501, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 42; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 53, § 2; 2000, ch. 927, §§ 4, 5; 2001, ch. 330, § 2; 2012, ch. 628, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

63-5-104. Board meetings and officers — Records — Copy of law to licensees.

The board shall meet at least annually and at such times and places as it may deem necessary for the proper discharge of its duties.

At its annual meeting the board shall elect from its membership a president, vice president and secretary-treasurer.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The proceedings of the board shall be recorded and shall constitute a public record.

The board shall maintain and make available to the division a permanent record that shall list the name, address and license or certificate number of all persons licensed to practice dentistry and of all persons certified as dental specialists, licensed as dental hygienists and registered as dental assistants.

The board shall mail a copy of the law regulating the practice of dentistry to each person who is hereafter licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 5; 1978, ch. 824, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-533; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 20; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 4, 5.

63-5-105. Powers of board.

The board has the following powers and duties in addition to the powers and duties granted to or imposed upon it by the other sections of this chapter:

Prescribe rules and regulations for examination of candidates;

Conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licenses to practice dentistry and of applicants for certificates to practice a specialty in dentistry or licenses to practice as a dental hygienist or registered as a dental assistant;

Provide standards by which dental schools and colleges, graduate dental programs in hospital settings, schools of dental hygiene and courses of instruction for dental assistants are approved;

Issue licenses to applicants who successfully pass the examination for the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene, to issue certificates to specialists in dentistry who successfully pass the respective examinations for such certificates and to register dental assistants who meet such standards of competency as the board may require by rules and regulations and who pay a nonrefundable application fee as set annually by the board;

Conduct hearings to revoke, suspend or otherwise lawfully discipline the holder of any license or certificate issued under the authority of this chapter or any previous laws authorizing the holder thereof to practice dentistry, a specialty in dentistry, dental hygiene or as a certified and/or registered dental assistant for violations by the licensee or certificate holder of any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule of the board hereafter properly promulgated by the board;

Provide for any evaluations, including onsite, of facilities, equipment and personnel of dentists who use general anesthesia, deep sedation or conscious sedation as the board determines appropriate in the interest of public safety; and

To make such rules and regulations and establish such fees as are necessary to carry out and make effective this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 6; 1978, ch. 824, § 5; 1981, ch. 99, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-534; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 21; 1988, ch. 635, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 523, § 7; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 6-8; 1997, ch. 53, § 3; 1999, ch. 341, § 1; 2001, ch. 330, § 3.

63-5-106. Annual report of board.

The board shall make an annual report of its proceedings and activities to the governor, with copies to be made available to any interested parties.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 7; 1981, ch. 99, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-535.

63-5-107. License requirement.

It is unlawful for any person to practice dentistry, a specialty in dentistry or dental hygiene in this state, except those who are now licensed or certified as such pursuant to law and those who may hereafter be licensed or certified and registered pursuant to this chapter.

It is unlawful for any person so licensed or certified to practice dentistry or to practice dental hygiene in any calendar year unless or until such person has paid the annual renewal fee for that year as provided in this chapter.

Each person licensed as a dentist or a dental hygienist in accordance with this chapter or registered as a dental assistant pursuant to the rules of the board is required to attend and complete each year, except in the year of initial licensure or registration, the number of hours of board approved continuing education courses prescribed by the board, subject to a minimum of twelve (12) and a maximum of thirty (30) clock hours; provided, that beginning January 3, 2003, in lieu of the annual continuing education requirement, each person licensed as a dentist or dental hygienist or registered as a dental assistant is required to attend and complete during each two-year cycle, except for the two-year cycle of initial licensure, the number of hours of board approved continuing education courses that are prescribed by the board, subject to a minimum of twenty-four (24) and a maximum of sixty (60) clock hours. However, for the purposes of the biennial continuing education requirement for dental hygienists, no more than fifty percent (50%) of such continuing education requirement may be earned from on-line or web-based courses. Sponsors of such courses shall submit a sufficient description of course content to the board in order to obtain approval. The board may approve all, part or none of the course at its discretion. Additional procedures for implementing this requirement may be adopted by the board in its regulations. The board may waive all or part of the continuing education requirements in unusual situations in which an applicant for renewal has demonstrated inability to attend such courses not attributable to fault of the applicant. The board shall have discretion to require completion of continuing education courses of a type and number of hours satisfactory to the board in cases involving license renewal of dentists or dental hygienists who have not actively practiced or have been retired from practice for more than two (2) years. In addition to the foregoing, all applicants shall provide proof of current CPR certification by an organization approved by the board unless such requirement is waived by the board in its discretion; provided, that no dentist who obtains a waiver from the board for CPR requirements shall practice dentistry unless a dentist, dental hygienist or dental assistant who is currently certified in CPR is present.

The board may, but is not required to, monitor or verify certificates of completion submitted by applicants for license renewal. In its discretion, by random sample or in individual cases, the board may require proof of attendance or otherwise investigate compliance with this subsection (c).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-536; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1990, ch. 1031, § 9; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1992, ch. 859, § 1; 2002, ch. 771, § 1; 2007, ch. 340, § 1; 2010, ch. 811, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of subsection (a), § 63-5-128.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1059.

63-5-108. Practice of dentistry and dental hygiene defined.

Dentistry is defined as the evaluation, diagnosis, prevention and/or treatment, by nonsurgical, surgical or related procedures, of diseases, disorders and/or conditions of the oral cavity, maxillofacial area and/or the adjacent and associated structures and their impact on the human body, provided by a dentist within the scope of such dentist's education, training, and experience, in accordance with the ethics of the profession and applicable law.

Any person is deemed to be practicing dentistry who, either gratuitously or for a salary, fee, money or other remuneration, paid or to be paid, directly to the operator or to any person or agency:

Diagnoses, prescribes for or treats any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, disorder and condition of the oral cavity, maxillofacial area and the adjacent and associated structures and their impact on the human body. Such diagnosis and treatment may include the use of a complete or limited physical evaluation of patients by a board eligible or board certified oral and maxillofacial surgeon or a resident in an approved oral and maxillofacial surgery program practicing in a hospital setting;

Extracts human teeth;

Repairs or fills cavities in human teeth;

Corrects malformations of human teeth or of the jaws;

Performs any oral and maxillofacial surgery;

Subject to subsection (d), takes an impression of the human tooth, teeth or jaws, leading to either:

The fabrication of a model upon which will be constructed a replacement of natural teeth by artificial substitutes; or

The fabrication of a cosmetic metal apparatus to be worn in the human mouth, whether or not the apparatus features silver, gold or platinum caps, jeweled inlays or any other cosmetic features;

Furnishes, supplies, constructs, alters, reproduces or repairs any prosthetic denture, bridge, crown, appliance or any other structure to be used or worn in the human mouth as a substitute for natural teeth, except on the written work order of a licensed and registered dentist;

Places or adjusts such appliance or structure in the human mouth;

Delivers the same to any person other than the licensed and registered dentist upon whose written work order the work was performed;

Offers to the public by any method to furnish, supply, construct, reproduce, reline, repair or otherwise process any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance or other structure to be worn in the human mouth;

Gives interpretations of dental radiographs;

Administers an anesthetic, except for a topical anesthetic in connection with a dental operation; provided, however, that a duly licensed dentist may delegate the administration of local anesthetic to dental hygienists who possess a permit to do so issued by the board. The board shall establish the qualifications, criteria and curricula required for issuance of permits to administer local anesthetic, by infiltration or by block, to duly licensed dental hygienists;

Uses the words, “Dentist,” “Dental Surgeon,” “Oral Surgeon,” “Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeon,” or letters “D.D.S.,” “D.M.D.,” or any other words, letters, title, or descriptive matter that in any way represents the person as being able to diagnose, treat, prescribe or operate for any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, disorder, and condition of the oral cavity, maxillofacial area and the adjacent and associated structures and their impact on the human body;

States, or permits to be stated by any means or method whatsoever, that the person can or will attempt to perform dental operations or services or to render diagnosis in connection therewith;

Is the operator of a place where dental operations or dental services are performed; or

Authorizes the practice of “teledentistry” which, as used in this section, means the delivery of dental health care and patient consultation through the use of telehealth systems and technologies, including live, two-way interactions between a patient and a dentist licensed in this state using audiovisual telecommunications technology, or the secure transmission of electronic health records and medical data to a dentist licensed in this state to facilitate evaluation and treatment of the patient outside of a real-time or in-person interaction. Dentists who are licensed in this state and who deliver services using teledentistry shall establish protocols for the practice that should include proper methods of keeping the patient fully informed; proper safeguards ensuring that all state and federal laws and regulations relative to the privacy of health information are followed; proper documentation of all services or treatment rendered via teledentistry; proper procedures to ensure the referral of those patients requiring treatment beyond what can be provided via teledentistry to a dentist licensed in this state; and any such requirements as prescribed by the board of dentistry. Any and all services provided via teledentistry shall be consistent with the in-person provision of those services. Any and all services provided via teledentistry shall comply with this chapter and shall be provided in accordance with the rules of the board of dentistry.

A dental hygienist is an individual who has graduated from a dental hygiene program accredited by the American Dental Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) and is licensed under this chapter to practice dental hygiene.

The practice of dental hygiene means the performance of preventive, educational, and therapeutic services including the removal of all hard and soft deposits and the stain from the human teeth to the depth of the gingival sulcus, polishing natural and restored surfaces of teeth, performing clinical examination of teeth and surrounding tissues for diagnosis by the dentist, and performing other procedures that may be delegated by the dentist, under the supervision of a licensed dentist.

No person shall practice dental hygiene in a manner that is separate or independent from a supervising dentist, or establish or maintain an office or a practice that is primarily devoted to the provision of dental hygiene services.

A dental hygienist shall perform, under direct supervision only, root planing, subgingival curettage, administering nitrous oxide, and local anesthesia.

Under general supervision a dental hygienist may provide to patients, for not more than fifteen (15) consecutive business days, all other dental hygiene services not otherwise limited to direct supervision by this chapter or rules adopted by the board, if all of the following requirements are met:

The dental hygienist has at least one (1) year, full-time, or an equivalent amount of experience practicing dental hygiene;

The dental hygienist complies with written protocols for emergencies that the supervising dentist establishes;

The supervising dentist examined the patient not more than eleven (11) months prior to the date the dental hygienist provides the dental hygiene services;

The dental hygienist provides dental hygiene services to the patient in accordance with a written treatment plan developed by the supervising dentist for the patient; and

The patient is notified in advance of the appointment that the supervising dentist will be absent from the location and that the dental hygienist cannot diagnose the patient's dental health care status.

Any duly licensed and registered dentist may assign to duly licensed and registered dental hygienists, registered dental assistants and/or practical dental assistants, as defined by the board in rules and regulations, any tasks or procedures to be performed in the dentist's office for which a licensed and registered dentist exercises direct supervision and full responsibility, except those procedures requiring the professional judgment or skill of a dentist; provided, that duties involving the removal of hard and soft deposits by scaling or curretage from the surfaces of human teeth are assigned only to duly licensed and registered dental hygienists. The board has the authority to permit registered dental assistants to apply sealants to and to polish human teeth, and the board has the discretion to establish criteria and curricula as necessary to ensure that such registered dental assistants are qualified to apply sealants and perform polishing. For eligibility to perform polishing, passage of a clinical and didactic examination is required. The board is authorized to permit licensed and registered dental hygienists and registered dental assistants to insert, pack, carve and finish amalgam and intracoronal nonmetallic restorations and take final impressions for fixed and removable prosthetic appliances, under the direct supervision and full responsibility of a licensed dentist, and the board shall establish such criteria and curricula as it determines in its discretion are necessary or appropriate to ensure that such hygienists and assistants are qualified to perform such procedures. Tasks and procedures assignable to licensed and registered dental hygienists shall include those enumerated in the board's regulations as of January 1, 1990, and such other additional tasks and procedures as the board may deem appropriate in the future. Procedures requiring professional judgment or skill not assignable to such dental hygienists and dental assistants include the following:

Diagnosis and treatment planning; oral surgery, the cutting of hard and/or soft tissues, excluding any cutting of such tissues involved in subgingival scaling, root planing and gingival curettage, and any intra-oral procedures that would affect the function and/or efficiency of an appliance that, when worn by the patient, would come in direct contact with hard or soft tissue and that could result in tissue irritation or injury;

The placing of permanent fillings or restorations in or on teeth except as provided in this subsection (d); and

Administration of a general or local anesthetic, except for a topical anesthetic in connection with a dental operation; provided, however, that dental hygienists who possess a permit issued pursuant to subdivision (b)(12) may administer a local anesthetic but only under the direct supervision of a licensed and registered dentist who is physically present at the same office location and time and in accordance with rules and regulations of the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a dental hygienist may administer nitrous oxide analgesia if directed by a dentist to do so, in accordance with rules and regulations of the board of dentistry, under the direct supervision of a licensed and registered dentist. Patients who have been administered nitrous oxide shall be monitored appropriately.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), a licensed dentist shall not allow, under general supervision, more than three (3) dental hygienists to work at any one (1) time.

A dentist may supervise, under direct supervision, no more than ten (10) dental hygienists while the dentist and each hygienist is providing dental services on a volunteer basis through a nonprofit provider of free mobile clinics in this state.

Any duly licensed and registered dentist who uses general anesthesia, deep sedation or conscious sedation in that dentist's practice, at a level to be determined by the board, must secure a permit from the board by meeting the standards as set in rules and regulations and by paying fees set by the board. Such permit is subject to renewal at intervals upon payment of a fee as set by the board in rules and regulations. Any dental facility in which general anesthesia, deep sedation or conscious sedation is administered by such dentist is subject to standards as may be specified in rules and regulations of the board, including, but not limited to, a facility permit.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the practice of dental hygiene also includes prescriptive authority limited to fluoride agents, topical oral anesthetic agents, and nonsystemic oral antimicrobials that:

Are not controlled substances under state and federal drug laws; and

Do not require a license from the federal drug enforcement agency.

Prescriptive authority under this section must be:

Exercised under the general supervision of a licensed dentist;

Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board; and

In compliance with all applicable laws concerning prescription packaging, labeling, and record keeping requirements.

A prescription written by a dental hygienist under this part must be reviewed by a dentist within thirty (30) days.

The board shall determine by rule the educational and training requirements necessary for a dental hygienist to exercise prescriptive authority pursuant to this section.

The board shall determine by rule the percentage of fluoride or any other active ingredient in any medication that may be prescribed by a dental hygienist under this subsection (h).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 9; 1963, ch. 107, § 1; 1969, ch. 29, § 2; 1978, ch. 824, § 6; 1981, ch. 99, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-537; Acts 1988, ch. 635, §§ 3-7; 1989, ch. 523, § 8; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 10, 11; 1998, ch. 847, §§ 1-3; 1999, ch. 405, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 839, § 1; 2001, ch. 330, § 4; 2002, ch. 771, §§ 2-4; 2003, ch. 161, § 1; 2003, ch. 237, §§ 1-4; 2004, ch. 615, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 120, § 1; 2010, ch. 1043, § 8; 2011, ch. 132, § 1; 2012, ch. 945, § 1; 2016, ch. 918, § 1; 2019, ch. 319, § 1; 2020, ch. 724, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, added (h).

The 2020 amendment, in (f)(1), inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2),” and substituted “shall not” for “may not”; and added (f)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 319, § 2. July 1, 2020; provided, that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 8, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 724, § 2. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Employment of and practice by hygienists and assistants, § 63-5-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1059.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of botox, other neurotoxins, and dermal fillers by a general dentist. OAG 14-51, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 54 (4/24/14).

63-5-109. Exemptions.

The following persons, acts, practices and operations are exempt from the other provisions of this chapter:

The practice of their professions by physicians or surgeons licensed as such under the laws of this state, unless they practice dentistry as a specialty;

The practice of dentistry and dental hygiene in the discharge of their official duties by graduate dentists and by dental hygienists in the United States public health service, army, navy, air force, coast guard or veterans administration;

The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists or the practice of dental hygiene by licensed dental hygienists of other states or countries at meetings of the Tennessee Dental Association or Pan Tennessee Dental Association, or component parts thereof, alumni meetings of dental colleges or any other like dental organizations while appearing as clinicians;

Licensed dentists or dental hygienists of other states who are called into Tennessee by licensed dentists of this state for consultative or operative purposes if the board or its designee gives discretionary advance approval in each such instance;

The practice of dentistry or of dental hygiene by graduates of schools or colleges recognized by the board who are duly licensed in other states in the discharge of their official duties in state-supported institutions or official health agencies or other special projects approved by the board between the time of their employment as such and the next examination and licensing by the board;

The practice of dentistry or of dental hygiene by students under the supervision of instructors in any dental school, college or dental department of any school, college, university or school of dental hygiene recognized by the board, but such activities shall not be carried on for profit;

The giving by a registered nurse anesthetist of any anesthetic for a dental operation under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist;

The construction, reproduction, restoration, alteration or repair of bridges, crowns, dentures or any other prosthetic or orthodontic appliances or materials to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth or for correction or regulation of natural teeth, upon order, prescription or direction of a licensed dentist, when the impressions, casts or models thereof have been made or taken by a licensed and registered dentist, a licensed and registered dental hygienist under the direct supervision of a licensed and registered dentist or a registered dental assistant under the direct supervision of a licensed and registered dentist; provided, that such prosthetic dentures or orthodontic appliances or bridges or the services rendered in construction, repair, restoration or alteration thereof are not advertised, other than in a professional or trade journal, or by direct mail to licensed dentists or other laboratories and are not sold or delivered directly or indirectly to the public by any unlicensed person or dental laboratory, either as principal or as agent;

Dental interns and externs or graduates of dental and dental hygiene schools or colleges recognized by the board employed by licensed hospitals or other agencies recognized and approved by the board;

Personnel involved in research or developmental projects, approved by the board, that are under the auspices and direction of a recognized educational institution or the department of health;

Graduates of dental schools or colleges serving as clinical instructors in board-recognized teaching institutions, while performing only those duties required by and under the supervision of such teaching institutions, upon completing prescribed registration forms and payment of a fee as set by the board; however, such exemption shall be confined to the interim immediately prior to the next scheduled applicable examination of the board and shall not be extended if the applicant does not successfully pass the examination;

Dentists and dental hygienists duly licensed in other states who desire to work with special projects recognized and approved by the board may do so under the sponsorship of a local dentist and the auspices of the local dental society for a period of six (6) months;

Dentists or dental hygienists duly licensed in other states practicing within authorized Tennessee department of health programs or programs affiliated with the Tennessee department of health for a period not to exceed twenty-four (24) months;

The application of fluoride varnish to the teeth of at-risk, underserved persons in or under the auspices of a state, county or municipal public health clinic by public health nurses or nurse practitioners;

The application of dental sealants to the teeth of individuals in a setting under the direction of a state or local health department by licensed hygienists, without requiring an evaluation by a dentist prior to such application, under a protocol established by the state or a metropolitan health department; or

The application of topical fluoride to the teeth of individuals in a setting under the direction of a state or local health department by licensed hygienists, without requiring an evaluation by a dentist prior to such application, under a protocol established by the state or a metropolitan health department.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 10; 1969, ch. 29, § 3; 1973, ch. 166, §§ 2, 3; 1978, ch. 824, § 7; 1981, ch. 99, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-538; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 22; 1985, ch. 71, § 2; 1988, ch. 635, §§ 8, 9; 1989, ch. 523, § 9; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 12, 13; 2002, ch. 771, §§ 5, 6; 2004, ch. 563, § 1; 2013, ch. 110, §§ 1-3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 5.

63-5-110. Application for license — Reciprocity.

A person desiring to obtain a license to practice dentistry in this state shall make application to the board. The application must be accompanied by a certificate showing that the applicant is a graduate of an accredited dental school or college or from the dental department of a university approved by the board.

The applicant shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age, a citizen of the United States or Canada or legally entitled to live within the United States and of good moral character and reputation.

The application must be accompanied by the applicant's photograph and by a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board in rules and regulations.

The board is authorized to cause a license to be issued to an applicant of good moral character and professional competence who is licensed to practice dentistry in another state, which shall include the District of Columbia or a territory of the United States, if the board determines to its satisfaction that the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

Currently holds a valid license to practice dentistry in another state and provides a copy of such license, and also provides the name of another state in which the applicant is or has been licensed;

Absence of any pending disciplinary charges or action in another state or any current investigation by a disciplinary authority or another state and provides pertinent information about any disciplinary action imposed against the applicant in any other state, which the board is to evaluate and determine whether such is disqualifying for licensure in this state;

Has not failed previously an examination for licensure to practice dentistry in Tennessee;

Graduation from a dental school or college duly accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation;

Demonstrates intent to actively practice or teach in Tennessee;

Has, pursuant to the authority of a state dental licensing board or boards:

Practiced dentistry in another state or states for at least five (5) years;

Taught in an American Dental Association accredited institution for at least five (5) years;

Any combination of subdivision (b)(6)(A) or subdivision (b)(6)(B) for at least five (5) years;

Practiced dentistry for at least two (2) years in another state or states and, in addition, presents satisfactory evidence of passing an examination administered by another state substantially equivalent to the examination required for initial licensure in Tennessee, the appropriateness of such examinations to be evaluated and determined by the board;

Taught for at least two (2) years in an American Dental Association accredited institution and, in addition, presents satisfactory evidence of passing an examination administered by a regional testing agency or a clinical board examination administered by another state substantially equivalent to the examination required for initial licensure in Tennessee, the appropriateness of such examination to be evaluated and determined by the board; or

Any combination of subdivision (b)(6)(D) or subdivision (b)(6)(E) for at least two (2) years; and

Payment of a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board.

The board is authorized, in its discretion, to issue a limited license for educational purposes to any dentist who is duly licensed to practice in any other state who meets the requirements of the board and who submits satisfactory evidence of good moral character and professional competence, including a certificate to that effect from the licensing or registration board from all states in which the applicant has held a license, upon payment of a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

The board shall direct the division to issue a license to an applicant, without the necessity of further examination except as required by § 63-5-113, if the board determines that the applicant meets all of the following qualifications:

Is a graduate with either a D.D.S. or D.M.D. degree of an accredited dental school or college or of a dental department of a university approved by the board;

Is licensed to practice dentistry in another state, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or a dependency of the United States;

Has successfully completed a graduate training program in a recognized specialty branch of dentistry; and

Is currently duly licensed to practice medicine in this state.

The board is authorized, in its discretion, to issue a limited license for the practice of dentistry in American Dental Association accredited institutions or dental education programs or in federally-designated health professional shortage areas, if the applicant meets the following requirements:

Is a graduate of a school of dentistry with a degree substantially equivalent to either a D.D.S. or D.M.D. degree;

Has successfully completed a graduate training program in a recognized specialty branch of dentistry from an advanced specialty program accredited by the American Dental Association;

Has successfully completed the national board examinations;

Payment of nonrefundable fee, as set by the board;

Provides satisfactory evidence of good moral character and professional competency;

Provides proof of naturalization or ability to live and work in the United States; and

Meets other requirements as set by the board.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 11; 1963, ch. 107, § 2; 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1973, ch. 166, § 4; 1976, ch. 497, § 1; 1978, ch. 824, § 8; 1981, ch. 99, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-539; Acts 1984, ch. 608, § 1; 1984, ch. 937, § 23; 1988, ch. 635, § 10; 1989, ch. 523, § 10; 1991, ch. 143, § 2; 2001, ch. 330, § 5; 2002, ch. 771, § 7.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).